Wisconsin, session 2025, AB680.
do enact as follows:AB680,11Section 1. 94.55 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB680,3,9194.55 (1) Definition. In this section, “hemp” means the plant Cannabis 2sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, 3extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing 4or not, with a delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3 5percent on a dry weight basis or the maximum concentration allowed under federal 6law up to 1 percent, whichever is greater, as tested using post-decarboxylation or 7other similarly reliable methods. “Hemp” includes an intoxicating hemp product, as 8defined in s. 94.56 (1) (c). “Hemp” does not include a prescription drug product that 9has been approved by the U.S. food and drug administration.AB680,210Section 2. 94.55 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB680,3,121194.55 (1m) Exemption. Subsections (2) to (4) do not apply to intoxicating 12hemp products, as defined in s. 94.56 (1) (c).AB680,313Section 3. 94.56 of the statutes is created to read:AB680,3,151494.56 Intoxicating hemp products. (1) Definitions. (a) “Hemp” has the 15meaning given in s. 94.55 (1).AB680,3,1616(b) “Intoxicating cannabinoid” means any of the following:AB680,3,17171. Delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol.AB680,3,18182. Delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol.AB680,3,19193. Delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol.AB680,3,20204. Tetrahydrocannabinolic acid.AB680,3,21215. Hexahydrocannabinol.AB680,3,22226. Tetrahydrocannabiphorol.AB680,3,23237. Tetrahydrocannabinol-O-acetate.AB680,4,218. Any other cannabinoid or cannabinoid derivative that produces intoxication 2when consumed.AB680,4,43(c) “Intoxicating hemp product” means any of the following, regardless of the 4concentration of nonintoxicating cannabinoids:AB680,4,651. A hemp product that contains intoxicating cannabinoids at a concentration 6of more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.AB680,4,972. A hemp product in the form of a beverage that contains intoxicating 8cannabinoids at a concentration level of 1.0 milligram or more per 12 fluid ounces of 9beverage.AB680,4,11103. An edible hemp product that contains intoxicating cannabinoids at a 11concentration level of 1.0 milligram or more per serving or per package.AB680,4,1212(d) “Nonintoxicating cannabinoid” means any of the following:AB680,4,13131. Cannabidiol.AB680,4,14142. Cannabigerol.AB680,4,15153. Cannabichromene.AB680,4,16164. Cannabinol.AB680,4,18175. Any other cannabinoid, other than tetrahydrocannabinol or its precursors, 18that does not produce intoxication at typical serving levels.AB680,4,2119(2) Sampling, testing, and certificates of analysis for intoxicating 20hemp products. No person may sell an intoxicating hemp product unless all of the 21following apply:AB680,5,222(a) The intoxicating hemp product manufacturer has submitted a 23representative sample of each intoxicating hemp product to an independent, 1accredited laboratory for testing in accordance with generally accepted industry 2standards.AB680,5,113(b) The intoxicating hemp product is accompanied by a certificate of analysis 4from the laboratory that tested it under par. (a) indicating what, if any, 5contaminants are in the intoxicating hemp product, the kinds of cannabinoids in 6the intoxicating hemp product, and the level of cannabinoid potency in the 7intoxicating hemp product, and verifying that the intoxicating hemp product meets 8the definition of an intoxicating hemp product under sub. (1) (c). The certificate of 9analysis shall accompany an intoxicating hemp product by means of a quick 10response code on the intoxicating hemp product’s package label as it appears to a 11consumer at the time of sale.AB680,5,1412(3) Packaging and labeling requirements. In addition to any packaging 13and labeling requirements established under federal law, no person may sell an 14intoxicating hemp product in this state unless all of the following apply:AB680,5,1615(a) The intoxicating hemp product is packaged for retail sale in child-16resistant, tamper-evident, and opaque packaging.AB680,5,1817(b) If the intoxicating hemp product’s package contains multiple servings, the 18intoxicating hemp product’s package is resealable.AB680,5,2119(c) The intoxicating hemp product’s appearance or packaging does not appeal 20to children in its resemblance to candy, snacks, or other products marketed to 21appeal to children.AB680,5,2322(d) The intoxicating hemp product is packaged and the package’s label as it 23appears to a consumer at the time of sale includes all of the following information:AB680,5,24241. The name and type of the packaged intoxicating hemp product.AB680,6,112. The net weight or volume of the packaged intoxicating hemp product.AB680,6,323. The recommended serving size of the packaged intoxicating hemp product 3and the number of serving sizes that are included in the package.AB680,6,544. The type and amount, or potency, of any cannabinoid contained in each 5recommended serving size of the packaged intoxicating hemp product.AB680,6,765. A complete list of ingredients contained in the packaged intoxicating hemp 7product. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab680 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab680 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB680 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB680 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB680: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting